New Jersey, session 222, A5152.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 7 of P.L.1974, c.79 (C.18A:58-37.7) is amended to read as follows: 7.  The sums payable as State aid to school districts pursuant to [this act] P.L.1974, c.79 (C.18A:58-37.1 et seq.) shall be paid in full no later than July 31. The State Treasurer shall make such payment to each board of education upon a certificate of the commissioner and warrant of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. [A] In the event that the expenditure incurred by any district pursuant to P.L.1974, c.79 (C.18A:58-37.1 et seq.) for nonpublic school textbook services is less than the amount of State aid received, the district may use the unexpended State aid for expenditures under the Nonpublic Technology Initiative.  If the expenditures incurred by a district for these programs are less than the total amount of State aid received for the programs, the district shall refund any unexpended State aid after completion of the school year [if the expenditures incurred by the district pursuant to P.L. 1974, c. 79 (C. 18A:58-37.1 et seq.) are less than the amount of State aid received therefor].  The refund shall be paid no later than December 1. (cf: P.L.1986, c.17, s.1) 2.  (New section)  In the event that the expenditures incurred by a school district under the Nonpublic Technology Initiative is less than the amount of State aid received, the district may use the unexpended State aid for nonpublic school textbook services expenditures under P.L.1974, c.79 (C.18A:58-37.1 et seq.).  If the expenditures incurred by a district are less than the total amount of State aid received for these programs, the district shall refund the unexpended State aid after the completion of the school year, but not later than December 1 of the following school year. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.